Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.918

Disability history month—Activities.

Annually, during the month of October, each of the public institutions of higher education shall conduct or promote educational activities that provide instruction, awareness, and understanding of disability history and people with disabilities. The activities may include, but not be limited to, guest speaker presentations.

[ 2008 c 167 s 4.]